Hawaii statutes.
PART 9.
SPECIAL PROVISIONS RELATING TO DISTRIBUTION

§560:3-901 Successors' rights if no
administration. In the absence of administration, the heirs and devisees
are entitled to the estate in accordance with the terms of a probated will or
the laws of intestate succession. Devisees may establish title by the probated
will to devised property. Persons entitled to property by homestead allowance,
exemption or intestacy may establish title thereto by proof of the decedent's
ownership, decedent's death, and their relationship to the decedent.
Successors take subject to all charges incident to administration, including
the claims of creditors and allowances of surviving spouse or reciprocal
beneficiary and dependent children, and subject to the rights of others
resulting from abatement, retainer, advancement, and ademption. [L 1996, c 288,
pt of §1; am L 1997, c 383, §19]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next